Louisiana, session 2026, SB435.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Subpart C of Part II of Chapter 3 of Title 46 of the Louisiana Revised
Statutes of 1950, comprised of R.S. 46:261, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
SUBPART C. FATHERHOOD ENGAGEMENT
§261. Louisiana Commission on Fatherhood Engagement
A. There is hereby established within the office of the governor, the
Louisiana Commission on Fatherhood Engagement, hereafter referred to as the
"commission".
Page 1 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 435 ENROLLED
B. The commission shall be comprised of the following members:
(1) The director of early childhood systems in the office of the governor.
(2) The executive director of the Louisiana Children's Cabinet, or his
designee.
(3) The secretary of the Louisiana Department of Children and Family
Services, or his designee.
(4) The superintendent of the Louisiana Department of Education, or his
designee.
(5) The secretary of the Louisiana Department of Public Safety and
Corrections, or his designee.
(6) The director of the bureau of family health within the Louisiana
Department of Health, or his designee.
(7) The secretary of Louisiana Works, or his designee.
(8) A member of the Senate appointed by the president of the Senate.
(9) A member of the House of Representatives appointed by the speaker of
the House of Representatives.
(10) A representative from the Louisiana Supreme Court.
(11) The director of the Louisiana Head Start Collaboration.
(12) The chief executive officer of the Louisiana Policy Institute for Children,
or his designee.
(13) A family court judge appointed by the governor.
(14) A representative of a faith community that promotes fatherhood
engagement appointed by the governor.
(15) A representative from a parenting education organization that works in
multiple parishes appointed by the governor.
(16) One representative each from an organization that provides fatherhood
programs in each of the nine public health regions of the state. If there is no
organization that provides fatherhood programs in any region, this position shall be
filled by a father who is a community leader or an additional faith-based
representative appointed by the governor.
Page 2 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 435 ENROLLED
C. A majority of the members of the commission shall constitute a quorum
for the transaction of business, and all official action of the commission shall require
the favorable vote of a majority of those members present and voting.
D. Members appointed to the commission shall serve two-year terms. The
directors, secretaries, and superintendents, or their designees shall serve on the
commission until they cease to be a director, secretary, or superintendent. Each
member shall serve on the commission from the date of appointment until the end
of the term for which the member was appointed. Members may be reappointed.
E. Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments.
Any member appointed to fill a vacancy occurring prior to the expiration date of the
term for which the member's predecessor was appointed shall serve on the
commission for the remainder of that term. A member shall continue to serve on the
commission subsequent to the expiration date of the member's term until the
member's successor is appointed.
F. Members shall serve without compensation but shall be eligible for
reimbursement for necessary expenses.
G.(1) The director of early childhood systems in the office of the
governor shall call the first meeting of the commission.
(2) The commission shall elect a chairperson from among its members
in every even-numbered year.
H. The duties of the commission shall include but not be limited to all of
the following:
(1) Implementing the recommendations made by the Task Force on
Fatherhood Engagement and all ensuing recommendations developed and
approved by the commission pursuant to Senate Concurrent Resolution No. 9
of the 2025 Regular Session of the Legislature.
(2) Raising awareness of the importance of fathers' engagement in the
lives of their children, resources and support available to Louisiana fathers, and
the challenges and barriers facing Louisiana fathers.
(3) Identifying resources available to fund fatherhood-related programs
Page 3 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 435 ENROLLED
and assist in the creation or expansion of initiatives that do the following:
(a) Promote responsible fatherhood.
(b) Build the parenting and co-parenting skills of fathers.
(c) Provide employment-related services for low-income fathers.
(d) Provide services to fathers who are incarcerated or have been
recently released from incarceration to allow them to maintain or reestablish
their relationships with their families.
(e) Reconcile fathers with their families.
(f) Provide support for effective fatherhood programming across state
agencies.
(g) Improve data collection and usage on fathers and fatherhood
engagement across agencies.
(h) Improve support for fathers during the perinatal period.
(i) Assist fathers with minor children in addressing barriers to accessing
and maintaining stable housing.
(j) Improve policies and practices to ensure fair and equal opportunities
for fathers in child custody, visitation, and family court proceedings.
(k) Increase public awareness of the critical role fathers play.
(4) Organizing a state summit on fatherhood at least once every four
years.
(5) Reporting annually on the commission's expectations for the
outcomes of fatherhood-related programs and initiatives and the methods the
commission uses for conducting annual measures of those outcomes.
(6) Submitting a comprehensive report to the legislature annually with
a funding request for fatherhood programs that are overseen by the commission
and allocated to community organizations to support programs and services
aligned with the commission's intent and purpose.
I. The provisions of this Section shall terminate on January 1, 2030.
Section 2. Subpart C of Part II of Chapter 3 of Title 46 of the Louisiana Revised
Statutes of 1950, comprised of R.S. 46:261, is hereby repealed in its entirety.
Page 4 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 435 ENROLLED
Section 3.(A) This Section and Section 1 of this Act shall become effective August 1,
2026.
(B) Section 2 of this Act shall become effective January 1, 2030.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 5 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.